New York, session 2025-2026, S1767.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 37 of the environmental conservation law is amended 2 by adding a new title 12 to read as follows: 3 TITLE 12 4 POLYTETRAFLUOROETHYLENE COOKWARE 5 Section 37-1201. Definitions. 6 37-1202. Prohibition on manufacture, sale, and use of cookware 7 containing polytetrafluoroethylene. 8 37-1203. Preemption. 9 37-1204. Rules and regulations. 10 § 37-1201. Definitions. 11 For purposes of this title: 12 1. "Cookware" shall mean supplies used for cooking that interact with 13 food, including those supplies used for preparing, serving, and storing 14 food. "Cookware" shall include, but shall not be limited to, pots, pans, 15 skillets, grills, cooking utensils, and cooking appliances. 16 2. "Polytetrafluoroethylene" shall mean the compound used as a coating 17 in non-stick cookware. "Polytetrafluoroethylene" may also be known as 18 "PTFE". 19 § 37-1202. Prohibition on manufacture, sale, and use of cookware 20 containing polytetrafluoroethylene. 21 On and after January first, two thousand twenty-six, no person shall 22 manufacture, distribute, sell or offer for sale, or use in the state any 23 cookware containing polytetrafluoroethylene. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05334-01-5 S. 1767 2 1 § 37-1203. Preemption. 2 Jurisdiction in all matters pertaining to polytetrafluoroethylene 3 cookware which is regulated pursuant to the provisions of this title 4 shall be vested exclusively in the state. 5 § 37-1204. Rules and regulations. 6 The department is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations 7 as it shall deem necessary to implement the provisions of this title. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.